California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

29474.

A person who makes a sworn statement pursuant to Section 29473 shall, within a reasonable time after the demand and receipt by the officer of the statement, present a written receipt to the commissioner of the county which is specified in the statement as the destination of the honey.

The receipt shall contain a signed statement by the person receiving such honey, that the honey, giving an accurate description of it, has been received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Standard Honey Containers [29501. - 29504.]

29501.

The standard units of net weight of honey in containers are as established by this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29502.

Containers which hold the following units of weight of honey are standard containers:60pounds 2pounds12 pounds 112 pounds10 pounds 1pound 6 pounds12 ounces avoirdupois 5pounds 8 ounces avoirdupois 3pounds 5ounces avoirdupois 212 pounds

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29503.

When honey is prepared for, and is shipped directly to, any foreign country, the containers of honey shall not be required to meet the unit of net weight standards required by the provisions of this article.

Any person preparing or shipping such honey shall, upon request of an enforcing officer, furnish such affidavits, receipts, or other evidence as may be required by the director, by regulations, as proof that such honey was, or is being, in fact prepared for, and shipped directly to, a foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

29504.

The director may promulgate regulations to permit the preparation, packing, shipment, or sale of honey in an experimental type of container which does not conform to the standards prescribed in this article. These regulations shall include container labeling standards which comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. California Color Standards [29531. - 29531.]

29531.

The classes as to color comprising the California standards shall conform to the United States color standards, using the readings on the Pfund honey scale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Emergency Standards, Containers, Color Classifications, and Markings [29551. - 29561.]

29551.

As used in this article, “emergency standard” means any emergency standard for honey, standard units of weight, type of container, color classifications, or markings required upon containers which is established by the director pursuant to Section 29552.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29552.

The director, upon petition of persons that are interested in the production or handling of honey, or upon his own motion, may establish emergency standards for honey, standard units of net weight, type of container, color classifications, or marking upon any container, if he makes any of the following findings regarding any provision of this chapter which relates to any of such subjects:

(a) It is difficult or impossible of performance by reason of laws or orders promulgated by authority of the government of the United States, or the standard weights are not appropriate for the country of destination as to honey intended to be shipped outside the United States, or because of scarcity of materials, labor, or equipment used in the production or marketing of honey regulated by this chapter.

(b) It results in a serious waste of honey otherwise available for human consumption, or in serious waste of other resources.

(c) It prevents the utilization of new technological developments to the serious disadvantage of producers or handlers of honey in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29553.

Emergency standards shall apply in lieu of the standards for honey, standard units of net weight, type of container, color classifications, or markings required upon any container set forth in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29554.

Every emergency standard which is established pursuant to this article shall be reasonably calculated to effectuate the purposes of the standard which it supersedes. No emergency standard shall be established which tends to lower any standard which relates to carrying or keeping quality of honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29555.

No emergency standard shall be construed to modify in any respect any provision of this chapter which is designed to prevent deception or mislabeling, or which is designed to prevent the marketing of honey which is unwholesome or which would fail to give consumer satisfaction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29556.

Every emergency standard which is issued pursuant to this article, before it may become effective, shall be published in one or more newspapers, trade papers, or industry publications which are deemed best adapted to give notice to interested persons, together with a notice of the time and place for hearing objections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29557.

The hearing shall be not less than 10 nor more than 20 days from the date of publication.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29558.

Notice of hearing shall be mailed not less than 10 days prior to the date of the hearing to all persons that have filed with the director a request for notice of such hearings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29559.

At the hearing, interested parties shall be heard and a record kept of the proceedings for determination by the director of the facts which are shown at the hearing. If it is developed by competent testimony that additional time will be required to produce further essential evidence, the director shall continue the hearing to a date which will allow sufficient time for the production of such evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29560.

The director, upon his findings on the facts shown at the hearing, shall rescind, modify, or affirm the emergency standard as published. The action of the director in rescinding, modifying, or affirming any emergency standard shall take effect on the day appointed therefor, and the emergency standard, as modified or affirmed, shall continue in effect until it is suspended or rescinded by the director, or until the 91st day after adjournment of the next regular session of the Legislature, whichever first occurs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29561.

Any emergency standard may be amended, suspended, or rescinded upon notice and hearing pursuant to the same procedure as is provided for the establishment of such standard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Comb Honey [29581. - 29587.]

29581.

All comb honey shall be conspicuously marked, either on the section or on its individual container, with all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the producer or distributor of the comb honey.

(b) The net weight of the comb section, stated in terms of whole ounces.

(c) One of the United States grades which are established for honey by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29582.

All comb honey shall meet the requirements of the color classification and grades as defined in United States grades, color standards, and packing requirements for honey by the United States Department of Agriculture, according to the color classification and grade as marked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29583.

Any container of comb honey which is marked as to color shall be considered as properly marked if the color of the honey in the container is equal to or lighter than the description as marked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29584.

Opaque containers of bulk or chunk comb honey shall be marked with the color the honey would be if extracted, unless it is in the unclassified grade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29585.

If comb honey is in crystallized form, a sample of the honey shall be liquefied and the honey graded on the liquid basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29586.

In order to allow for variations which are incident to proper grading and handling, not more than 5 percent, by count, of the containers or of the subcontainers in any lot of honey may be below the requirements for the grade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29587.

Comb honey which has crystallized shall be conspicuously marked with the word “crystallized” on a placard which is used in connection with such honey that has reference to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Extracted Honey [29611. - 29620.]

29611.

Every container or subcontainer of extracted honey shall be conspicuously marked with all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the producer or distributor of the extracted honey.

(b) The net weight of the honey in the container.

(c) One of the United States grades which are established for honey by the United States Department of Agriculture. This subdivision does not, however, apply to honey to which pollen has been added, if the amount of pollen added is visible and each such container is plainly and conspicuously labeled with the words “pollen added”.

(d) In the case of any opaque container, with the color of the honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29612.

All extracted honey shall meet the requirements of the color classifications and grades as defined in United States grades, color standards, and packing requirements for honey by the United States Department of Agriculture, according to the color classification and grade as marked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29613.

Any container of extracted honey which is marked as to color shall be considered as properly marked if the color of the honey in the container is equal to or lighter than the description as marked.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29614.

If extracted honey is in crystallized form, a sample of the honey shall be liquefied and the honey graded on the liquid basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29615.

All extracted honey regardless of grade term as marked, shall be free from serious damage and at least as free from excessive foreign material as honey that has been strained through standard bolting cloth of 23 meshes per inch. Serious damage means any injury or defect that seriously affects the appearance or edibility of the honey such as any of the following:

(a) Overheating, which destroys both natural color and flavor.

(b) Fermentation, which causes either foam or sourness, or both.

(c) Objectionable flavor from any substance or thing other than floral source.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29616.

In order to allow for variations which are incident to proper grading and handling, not more than 5 percent, by count, of the containers or of the subcontainers in any lot of honey may be below the requirements for the grade, but no part of this tolerance is allowed for defects which cause serious damage, as defined in Section 29615.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29617.

If the color of extracted honey is designated on the container or subcontainer, or upon a placard which has reference to such honey, it shall conform to the color definitions provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29618.

Any honey which is a blend of two or more floral types of honey shall not be labeled as honey from any one particular floral source alone unless one floral type is predominant. If one floral type is predominant, such honey may be labeled as to the predominant floral type, as determined by flavor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29619.

Any slack-filled container shall be conspicuously marked “slack-filled.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29620.

Extracted honey in containers which hold five ounces or more, shall be packed in standard containers and sold in the exact units of weight as set forth in the table of standard weights of honey in containers provided for in Section 29502.

If the combined net weight of the extracted honey in all subcontainers contained in one master container is equal to one of the units of weight specified in Section 29502, the unit is a standard unit of weight if sold as a unit directly to the consumer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Labeling of Honey as to Origin and Flavor [29641. - 29644.]

29641.

Any container or subcontainer of extracted honey which is produced entirely within this state may be conspicuously marked with the name “California.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29642.

A container or subcontainer of comb or extracted honey shall not be marked or labeled with the name “California” unless the honey in the container or subcontainer was produced entirely within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29643.

Every container and subcontainer of imported honey shall be labeled with the name of the territory or foreign country from which it is imported or, when it is repackaged subsequent to importation, in accordance with subdivision (a) or (b):

(a) As “imported,” if repackaged either as a blend with honey imported from one or more other foreign countries or is repackaged without such blending.

(b) As “domestic and imported blend,” if blended with domestic honey.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

29644.

If the floral flavor of comb or extracted honey is stated on the container the honey contained in the container or subcontainer shall be true to such flavor, unless the honey is a blend of two or more floral types and one floral type is predominant. If the honey is such a blend, it may be labeled as to the predominant floral type as determined by flavor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Violations [29671. - 29677.]

29671.

It is unlawful for any person to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, deliver for sale, load, ship, transport, or sell any honey, adulterated honey or any product which is marked, labeled, or designated as honey, in bulk or in any container or subcontainer which does not conform to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29672.

It is unlawful for any person to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, load, ship, transport, or sell a deceptive pack, lot, load, arrangement, or display of honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29673.

It is unlawful for any person to mislabel any container or subcontainer of honey or place any false or misleading statement on any wrapper, label, or lining of any container of honey, or on any placard which is used in connection with or which has reference to any honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29674.

It is unlawful for any person to place or pack any honey in any container or subcontainer which bears any markings, or any designation of brand, quality, grade, or other matter, unless all of such markings which do not properly and accurately apply to the product placed or packed in the container or subcontainer have been removed, erased, or obliterated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29675.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to move any honey, or any container of honey, to which any warning tag or notice has been affixed, except under written permit from an enforcing officer or under his or her specific direction.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

29676.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to do either of the following:

(1) Refuse to submit any container, subcontainer, load, or display of honey to the inspection of any enforcing officer.

(2) Refuse to stop any vehicle which contains any honey, for the purpose of inspection by an enforcing officer.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29677.

It is unlawful for any person to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, load, ship, transport, or sell, any of the following:

(a) Adulterated honey, unless the container is conspicuously marked, in letters or type of like size and character, which clearly and plainly indicate the contents.

(b) Any product which is labeled or marked with the designation “honey” alone, if the contents consist of part or all of products other than the nectar of floral exudations of plants which is gathered and stored in the comb by honeybees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Criminal Punishment and Procedure [29701. - 29703.]

29701.

(a) Unless otherwise specified, a violation of this chapter is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) A conviction of a second or subsequent violation of this chapter within any 12-month period is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

29702.

Any prosecution for the violation of any provision of this chapter may be made in any county where any part of the offense occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29703.

Any evidence which is taken by any enforcing officer in any county may be admitted in evidence in any prosecution in any other county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Public Nuisances [29731. - 29735.]

29731.

Any honey which is packed, stored, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, or being transported or sold in violation of any provision of this chapter, together with its containers, is a public nuisance. The honey shall be held by the person in whose possession it may be and shall not be moved from the place where it may be, except under the specific direction of an enforcement officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29732.

The enforcement officer may affix a warning tag or notice to the honey and its containers which are a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29733.

If a packer or owner of honey, or the agent of either, after notification to the packer, owner, or agent that the honey and its containers are a public nuisance, refuses, or fails within a reasonable time, to recondition or remark the honey so as to comply with all requirements of this chapter, the honey and its containers:

(a) May be seized by the director or any enforcement officer.

(b) By order of the superior court of the county within which the honey and its containers may be located, shall be condemned and destroyed, or released upon conditions the court, in its discretion, may impose to ensure that it will not be packed, delivered for shipment, shipped, transported, or sold in violation of this chapter. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case if the value of the property in controversy is less than or equal to the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case under Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

29734.

If an agent is found in possession of any honey which is a public nuisance, notice of rejection or any order of the court concerning the honey may be served on such agent and need not be served on the packer or owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29735.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to comply with the directions of any officer relating to the disposition of any honey which is a public nuisance, or with any order of court respecting it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group Act [29810. - 29812.]

29810.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The California citrus industry is in the process of adapting to a more competitive marketplace and to consumer tastes that continue to change. In the past five years, an estimated 40,000 acres of citrus have been removed from production and replaced with new varieties of citrus, a majority of which is mandarin fruit commonly called Clementines or W. Murcotts, which are intended to be seedless.

(2) According to the 2005 California Citrus Acreage Report, these varieties have increased substantially. In 2004, more than 10,000 acres of these varieties were bearing fruit. Another 2,000 acres began bearing fruit in 2005. The same report states that an additional 12,000 acres of these varieties have been planted but have yet to bear fruit. This production will come into maturity within the next three years, and more is being planted.

(3) Due to the production of other agricultural products in proximity to new seedless varieties of citrus, the production of these varieties may be in jeopardy. According to a University of California at Riverside study published in June of 2005, seedless mandarins command three to four times as much revenue as seeded mandarins. Other citrus-producing nations around the world have adopted citrus protection areas to limit damage created by cross-pollination.

(4) Honeybees are an essential component of agriculture as they pollinate approximately $6 billion worth of crops in California. Historically, honeybee colonies are placed in the citrus belt of Kern, Tulare, Fresno, and Madera Counties to support existing agricultural practices, including the pollination of several commodities and the production of honey. Colony Collapse Disorder has reduced the nation’s bee population by 25 percent in the past three years, which in turn has created pressure on other agricultural sectors that rely on a healthy bee population for pollination of their crops.

(b) Any regulation or best management practice adopted pursuant to this chapter shall not affect the actual pollination process of other commodities during their blooming cycle, nor shall it be implemented when almonds, avocados, peaches, plums, nectarines, seed crops, or other commodities require pollination.

(c) Any regulation or best management practice adopted pursuant to this chapter shall not affect the ability of property owners located within the area impacted by the regulation or best management practice to farm any commercial crop, including, but not limited to, honey, citrus, and other commodities recognized by the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

29811.

(a) Not later than 15 days after enactment of this chapter, the secretary shall designate a Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group from recommendations received by interested stakeholders. The Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group shall be established pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 588. For purposes of this chapter, “grower,” as used in subdivision (b) of Section 588, includes a beekeeper.

(b) The Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group shall meet on a regular and consistent basis in an effort to develop best management practices that address the coexistence issues related to production of seedless mandarin varieties located in Fresno, Kern, Madera, and Tulare Counties, while providing for the reasonable access to citrus for the California bee industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

29812.

The secretary shall give the Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group reasonable time to develop best management practices described in Section 29810.

(a) If the Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group reaches consensus of best management practices prior to June 1, 2008, the secretary may adopt regulations if, in the secretary’s judgment, this action is necessary to implement and enforce the best management practices.

(b) If the Seedless Mandarin and Honeybee Coexistence Working Group fails to reach consensus on best management practices by June 1, 2008, the secretary shall adopt regulations no later than February 1, 2009. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be limited to Fresno, Kern, Madera, and Tulare Counties, address the coexistence issues related to production of seedless mandarin varieties, and allow seedless mandarin producers to meet retail standards for seedless fruit, while providing reasonable access to citrus for the California bee industry. The regulations adopted may include the establishment of fees, not to exceed the cost of the program, to be paid by seedless mandarin growers, subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. REGULATION AND LICENSING OF DOGS [30501. - 31683.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [30501. - 30505.]

30501.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county or the governing body of any city may adopt Sections 30801, 30802, 30803, 30804, 30805, 30952, 31105, 31106, 31107, 31108, 31152, 31153, 31251, 31252, and 31254. If those sections are adopted by the board of supervisors of any county or the governing body of any city, those sections shall apply within the territorial limits of the county or the city, as the case may be. Nothing in this division requires a county to enforce those provisions within the territorial limits of any city located within the county.

(b) Whenever the term “board of supervisors,” “county,” “county clerk,” or “animal control officer” is used in this division, those terms shall also be deemed to include the governing body of a city, a city, the city clerk, or the animal control officer of a city, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 60, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30502.

Any dog license tag which is issued by any city and county or city constitutes compliance with this division if it is issued pursuant to an ordinance which does all of the following:

(a) Substantially complies with this division.

(b) Provides for the wearing of the license tag upon the collar of the dog.

(c) Provides for the keeping of a record which shall establish the identity of the person that owns or harbors the dog.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

30503.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), no public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall sell or give away to a new owner any dog that has not been spayed or neutered.

(2) For the purposes of this section a “rescue group” is a for-profit or not-for-profit entity, or a collaboration of individuals with at least one of its purposes being the sale or placement of dogs that have been removed from a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane shelter or that have been previously owned by any person other than the original breeder of that dog.

(b) (1) If a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state certifies that a dog is too sick or injured to be spayed or neutered, or that it would otherwise be detrimental to the health of the dog to be spayed or neutered, the adopter or purchaser shall pay the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group a deposit of not less than forty dollars ($40), and not more than seventy-five dollars ($75).

(2) The entity shall establish the amount of the deposit at the level it determines is necessary to encourage the spaying or neutering of dogs.

(3) The deposit shall be temporary, and shall only be retained until the dog is healthy enough to be spayed or neutered, as certified by a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

(4) The dog shall be spayed or neutered within 14 business days of that certification.

(5) The adopter or purchaser shall obtain written proof of spaying or neutering from the veterinarian performing the operation.

(6) If the adopter or purchaser presents proof of spaying or neutering to the entity from which the dog was obtained within 30 business days of obtaining the proof, the adopter or purchaser shall receive a full refund of the deposit.

(c) Public animal control agencies or shelters, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelters, humane society shelters, and rescue groups may enter into cooperative agreements with each other and with veterinarians in lieu of requiring spaying and neutering deposits to carry out this section.

(d) Any funds from unclaimed deposits made pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 1999, and any funds from deposits that are unclaimed after January 1, 2000, may be expended only for programs to spay or neuter dogs and cats, including agreements with a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals or a humane society or licensed veterinarian to operate a program to spay or neuter dogs and cats.

(e) This section only applies to a county that has a population exceeding 100,000 persons as of January 1, 2000, and to cities within that county.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30503.5.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Animal shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group.

(2) “Rescue group” means a for-profit or not-for-profit entity or a collaboration of individuals that removes dogs from a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane shelter, or rehomes a dog that has been previously owned by any person other than the original breeder of that dog.

(b) If an animal shelter or rescue group knows, to the best of the knowledge of the shelter or rescue group, that a dog, at the age of four months or older, bit a person and broke that person’s skin, thus requiring a state-mandated bite quarantine, the animal shelter or rescue group shall, before selling, giving away, or otherwise releasing the dog, do both of the following:

(1) Disclose in writing to the person to whom the dog is sold, given away, or transferred, the dog’s known bite history and the circumstances related to the bite.

(2) Obtain a signed acknowledgment from the person to whom the
 dog is sold, given away, or transferred that the person has been provided information about the dog as required by this section. The animal shelter or rescue group shall provide the person with a copy of the signed acknowledgment and retain the original copy in its files.

(c) These documentation and disclosure requirements are for the purpose of public safety and the appropriate placement of dogs. A documented bite history does not necessarily preclude a dog from being available for adoption, release, or transfer, notwithstanding any other law or local ordinance related to biting dogs.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 31401 and 31402, any violation of this section shall be punished by a civil
 fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), imposed by the city or county in which the animal shelter or rescue group is located. If the person who violates this section is a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group, the proceeds of the civil fine shall be paid to the local public animal control agency or shelter. If a public animal control agency or shelter violates this section, the proceeds of the civil fine shall be deposited into the treasury of the city or county in
 which the public animal control agency or shelter is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (AB 588)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30504.

For purposes of this division, each member of a litter of puppies, weaned or unweaned, shall be treated as an individual animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30505.

(a) A public animal shelter shall not charge an adoption fee for a dog if the person adopting the dog presents to the public animal shelter a current and valid driver’s license or identification card with the word “VETERAN” printed on its face pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) A public animal shelter may
 limit the number of dogs adopted from that public animal shelter pursuant to this section to one dog each six-month period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 205, Sec. 2.   (SB 245)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Special Provisions Applicable to Counties With a Population of Less Than 100,000 Persons [30520. - 30526.]

30520.

(a) This chapter only applies to a county that has a population of less than 100,000 persons as of January 1, 2000, and to cities within that county. A county whose population exceeds 100,000 persons in a year subsequent to January 1, 2000, shall be subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 30501) commencing on January 1 of the year immediately following the year in which the population of that county exceeds 100,000 persons.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group shall sell or give away any dog that has not been spayed or neutered.

(c) A public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group may not transfer to a new owner a dog that has not been spayed or neutered, except as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) A public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group may transfer to a new owner a dog that has not been spayed or neutered only if the animal shelter does both of the following:

(1) Requires a written agreement, executed by the recipient, acknowledging the dog is not spayed or neutered and the recipient agrees in writing to be responsible for ensuring the dog will be spayed or neutered within 30 business days after the agreement is signed.

(2) Receives from the recipient a sterilization deposit of not less than forty dollars ($40) and not more than seventy-five dollars ($75), the terms of which are part of the written agreement executed by the recipient under this section.

(e) Public animal control agencies or shelters, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelters, humane society shelters, and rescue groups may enter into cooperative agreements with each other and with veterinarians in lieu of requiring spaying and neutering deposits to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

30521.

(a) A spaying or neutering deposit may be either of the following:

(1) A portion of the adoption fee or other fees rendered in acquiring the dog, which will enable the adopter to take the dog for spaying or neutering to a veterinarian with whom the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group has an agreement that provides that the veterinarian will bill the shelter directly for the sterilization.

(2) A deposit that is both of the following:

(A) Refundable to the recipient if proof of spaying or neutering of the dog is presented to the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group not more than 30 business days after the date the dog is spayed or neutered.

(B) Forfeited to the public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, humane society shelter, or rescue group if proof of spaying or neutering is not presented to the animal shelter within 30 business days.

(b) A spaying or neutering deposit shall be in the amount determined by the shelter, but shall not be less than forty dollars ($40) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).
